Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.762

[Art. 112a] Use, possession, or distribution of controlled substances.

(1) Any person subject to this code who wrongfully uses, possesses, distributes, or introduces into an installation, vessel, vehicle, or aircraft used by or under the control of the armed forces or organized militia a substance described in subsection (2) of this section shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

(2) The substances referred to in subsection (1) of this section are the following:

(a) Opium, heroin, cocaine, amphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, methamphetamine, phencyclidine, barbituric acid, and cannabis and any compound or derivative of any such substance;

(b) Any substance not specified in (a) of this subsection that is listed on a schedule of controlled substances prohibited by the United States army; or

(c) Any other substance not specified in this subsection that is listed in Schedules I through V of section 202 of the federal controlled substances act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 812, as amended.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.

[ 2022 c 16 s 27; 2009 c 378 s 25.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2022 c 16: See note following RCW 69.50.101.